Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.30
Lead-contaminated dust, defined.

Lead-contaminated dust means surface dust in a residential dwelling or child-occupied facility that contains an area or mass concentration of lead at or in excess of levels identified by the department.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 32;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 659.